Rhode Island statutes. Title 17 Elections
Chapter 25 Rhode Island Campaign Contributions and Expenditures Reporting
17-25-20.
Eligibility criteria for matching public funds.

In order to receive matching public funds under §

17-25-19

, a qualifying candidate must comply with the following requirements:

The candidate must sign a statement under oath, as provided for in §

17-25-19

, pledging to comply with the limitations on contributions and expenditures for election purposes and with all the terms and conditions set forth in this chapter. Upon the filing of the statement, a candidate for general office shall be bound to abide by the limitations on contributions and expenditures set forth in this chapter and may not withdraw from his or her obligation to abide by these restrictions.

Subject to the provisions of paragraph (ii) of this subdivision, no participating candidate shall either receive or expend for election purposes more than a total of public and private funds in the sum of one million five hundred thousand dollars ($1,500,000) in an election cycle. No participating candidate for general office other than governor shall receive or expend for election purposes more than a total of public and private funds in the sum of three hundred seventy-five thousand dollars ($375,000) in an election cycle.

The limitations on contributions received from private sources, matching funds available from the state, and total permitted expenditures shall apply in the 1994 general election and, subject to appropriations by the general assembly, shall increase by a percentage to be determined by the board of elections in January of each year in which a general election involving general offices is held, beginning in 1998. In no case shall the increase exceed the total increase in the consumer price index since the month in which the previous general election involving general was held.

Only the first two thousand dollars ($2,000) of the aggregate private monetary contributions from a single private source within an election cycle shall be eligible for matching public funds for candidates for governor; provided, that the entire amount contributed shall be considered toward the dollar limits provided in subdivision (2) of this section.

Only the first one thousand dollars ($1,000) of the aggregate private monetary contributions from a single private source within an election cycle shall be eligible for matching public funds for candidates for lieutenant governor, secretary of state, attorney general, and general treasurer; provided, that the entire amount contributed shall be considered toward the dollar limits provided for in subdivision (2) of this section.

Any private funds lawfully contributed during the current election cycle shall be eligible for matching public funds subject to the terms and conditions of this section, and private funds donated during a preceding election cycle shall not be eligible for matching public funds.

The direct costs incurred in connection with raising campaign funds on behalf of a candidate shall not be deemed to be expenditures for the purposes of the limitations on expenditures set forth in subdivision (2) of this section. Direct costs shall include costs of printing and mailing invitations to fundraising events, solicitations for contributions, costs of hosting fundraising events, and travel to those events, but shall not include any portion of the salary or wages of campaign employees, nor the cost of any radio, television, computer/Internet/electronic device, or printed advertisement. The cost of a fundraising event must be less than the amount of money realized from the gross proceeds generated by the fundraising event in order to qualify for this exclusion.

If a candidate who has accepted public funds makes expenditures in excess of the permitted amounts, the candidate shall be liable for a civil assessment payable to the state in an amount equal to three (3) times the amount of excess funds expended. In addition, the candidate shall be ineligible for further participation in the public financing program during the same election cycle.

In order to receive payments under this section, any candidate for general office shall first meet the following additional minimum requirements:

Raise an amount in qualified private contributions equal to twenty percent (20%) of the total amount eligible to be matched for election as to the office sought;

Receive private contributions from a minimum of two hundred fifty (250) individuals contributing at least twenty-five dollars ($25.00) each for candidates for governor and receive private contributions from a minimum of one hundred (100) individuals contributing at least twenty-five dollars ($25.00) each, for candidates for lieutenant governor, secretary of state, attorney general and general treasurer; and

Comply with any and all applicable nomination provisions in this title and qualify for the general election ballot pursuant to the process set forth in this title.

No public funds received by any candidate pursuant to §§

17-25-19

—

17-25-27

of this chapter and no private funds used to qualify for the public funds shall be expended by the candidate for any purpose except to pay reasonable and necessary expenses directly related to the candidate’s campaign.

No public funds shall be expended by the candidate, except for one or more of the following uses directly related to the campaign of the candidate:

Purchase of time on radio or television stations; provided, however, the content of all television time shall include captioning for the deaf and hard of hearing and the content of all radio time must be available in a written or text format at the time of request;

Purchase of rental space on outdoor signs or billboards;

Purchase of advertising space on the computer/Internet/electronic device and in newspapers and regularly published magazines and periodicals;

Payment of the cost of producing the material aired or displayed on radio, television, outdoor signs or billboards, and computer/Internet/electronic device and in newspapers, regularly published magazines, and periodicals;

Payment of the cost of printing and mailing campaign literature and brochures;

Purchase of signs, bumper stickers, campaign buttons, and other campaign paraphernalia;

Payment of the cost of legal and accounting expenses incurred in complying with the public financing law and regulations as required by this chapter;

Payment of the cost of telephone deposits, installation charges, and monthly billings in excess of deposits;

Payment of the costs of public opinion polls and surveys; and

Payment of rent, utilities and associated expenses connected with the operation of an election headquarters or satellite election offices.

Contributions received and expended by any candidate for the purpose of defraying any expense or satisfying any loan obligations incurred prior to January 1, 1991, by the candidate in furtherance of his or her candidacy in a previous election cycle, as defined in subdivision

17-25-3(7)

, shall not be counted toward any contribution or expenditure limitation in §§

17-25-18

—

17-25-27

.

No candidate who has elected to receive public funds shall contribute to or loan to his or her own campaign a sum in excess of five percent (5%) of the total amount that a candidate is permitted to expend in a campaign for the office pursuant to §§

17-25-19

and

17-25-21

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 420, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 345, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 21, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 21, § 3; P.L. 1992, ch. 203, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 78, § 2; P.L. 1998, ch. 31, art. 32, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 223, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 235, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 229, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 230, § 1.

17-25-21.
Primary elections.

Any candidate eligible to receive public funds and electing to receive these funds who is challenged for nomination for general office in a political party primary shall be permitted to raise and expend an additional amount of private funds equal to one-third (1/3) of the maximum allowable expenditure amount for the office or equal to the total amount spent by the candidates’ opponent or opponents in the primary, whichever amount is less. The additional amount received in contributions must be expended prior to the primary election. The additional private contributions shall not be eligible for matching public funds.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 420, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 21, § 3.

17-25-22.
Time period for payment of public funds.

No public funds shall be dispersed to candidates until after the date of the primary election. In order to receive matching public funds, the candidate must be a candidate for general office who meets all of the requirements set forth in subdivision

17-25-20(6)

. The candidate must submit to the board of elections proof of receipt of qualifying private contributions and supporting documentation as required by the board. The board of elections shall, within five (5) business days of the receipt of the request for payment of matching funds, either pay over funds to the candidate or disallow all or a portion of the request and state in writing the reasons for the disallowance.

A candidate may submit supplemental applications for public funds until the time that the permitted limits are reached.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 420, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 21, § 3; P.L. 2001, ch. 176, § 2; P.L. 2011, ch. 229, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 230, § 1.

17-25-23.
Funds expended by person, committee of a political party, or political action committee — Private expenditure.

For the purposes of §§

17-25-19

and

17-25-20

, any funds expended by a person, committee of a political party, or political action committee to directly influence the outcome of the electoral contest involving the candidate shall be considered a contribution received by or an expenditure made by the candidate for general office, if one or more of the following relationships between the candidate and the person, committee of a political party, or political action committee is present:

There is any arrangement, coordination, or direction with respect to the expenditure between the candidate or the candidate’s agent and the person making the expenditure;

In the same election cycle, the person making the expenditure, including any officer, director, employee, or agent of the person, is or has been authorized to raise or expend funds on behalf of the candidate or the candidate’s authorized committees, or is or has been an officer of the candidate’s authorized committees, or is or has been receiving any form of compensation or reimbursement from the candidate, the candidate’s authorized committees, or the candidate’s agent;

The person making the expenditure, including any officer, director, employee, or agent of the person, has communicated with, advised, or counseled the candidate or the candidate’s agents at any time on the candidate’s plans, projects, or needs relating to the candidate’s pursuit of election to general office in the same election cycle, including any advice relating to the candidate’s decision to seek election to general office;

The person making the expenditure retains the professional services of any individual or other person also providing those services to the candidate in connection with the candidate’s pursuit of election to general office in the same election cycle, including any services relating to the candidate’s decision to seek election to general office;

The person making the expenditure, including any officer, director, employer, or agent of the person, has communicated or consulted at any time during the same election cycle about the candidate’s plans, projects, or needs relating to the candidate’s pursuit of election to general office, with:

Any officer, director, employee, or agent of a party committee that has made or intends to make expenditures or contributions, in connection with the candidate’s campaign; or

Any person whose professional services have been retained by a political party committee that has made or intends to make expenditures or contributions;

The expenditure is based on information provided to the person making the expenditure directly or indirectly by the candidate or the candidate’s agents about the candidate’s plans, projects, or needs; provided, that the candidate or the candidate’s agents are aware that the other person has made or is planning to make expenditures expressly advocating the candidate’s election; or

The expenditure is made by a person with the intention of seeking or obtaining any governmental benefit or consideration from the candidate by reason of the expenditure.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 420, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 21, § 3; P.L. 2011, ch. 229, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 230, § 1.

17-25-24.
Additional expenditures.

Any candidate eligible to receive public funds and electing to receive these funds whose opponent does not elect to receive public funds shall be permitted to raise additional private contributions and make additional expenditures for election purposes in an amount in excess of the candidate’s maximum allowable expenditure limit equal to the amount by which the expenditures of the opponent exceed the maximum allowable expenditure limit that would have applied to the opponent’s expenditures had the opponent elected to receive public funds.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 420, § 1.

17-25-25.
Surplus campaign funds.

Any candidate receiving public funds during any election cycle under the provisions of this chapter shall, within ninety (90) days after the completion of the election cycle, transfer to the general treasurer for deposit in the general fund fifty percent (50%) of any amount of the candidate’s total campaign funds unexpended as of the last day of the election cycle. The candidate may convert the remaining fifty percent (50%) of the amount to use for any political purposes not otherwise prohibited by law. The remaining fifty percent (50%) of that amount may not be converted to personal use by the candidate.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 420, § 1.

17-25-26.
Equal apportionment of expenditures for joint advertisements.

Any expenditure jointly made by any two (2) or more candidates for any newspaper, radio, or television advertisement primarily benefiting the candidate shall be attributed to and apportioned equally among those candidates who are clearly identified in that advertisement. The apportionments shall constitute campaign expenditures subject to all reporting requirements of this chapter and shall be counted toward any total campaign expenditures limit that may apply to each or any of the candidates.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 420, § 1.

17-25-27.
Post-audit of accounts — Publication.

The board may conduct a post-audit of all accounts and transactions for any election cycle and may conduct any other special audits and post-audits that it may deem necessary. The board shall publish a summary of the reports filed by candidates for general office pursuant to the public financing provision of this chapter on or before April 1 of the year following any year in which elections are held for statewide elective office.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 420, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 21, § 3.

17-25-28.
Board of elections — Regulation and auditing of matching fund program.

In addition to all other powers and duties established by law, the board of elections is empowered to adopt and enforce rules, regulations, and auditing procedures required to fulfill the mandates of §§

17-25-19

—

17-25-27

. The board is empowered, among other things, to:

Ascertain whether any contributions to or expenditures for candidates for general office have exceeded limits prescribed by §§

17-25-18

—

17-25-27

. Ascertain the amount and source of contributions received and expenditures made by all candidates for general offices, whether or not the candidate chose to participate in public financing.

Issue advisory opinions upon its own initiative or upon application of any candidate.

Conduct investigations and/or hearings relative to alleged violations of §§

17-25-18

—

17-25-27

, either on its own initiative or upon receipt of a verified written complaint, which complaint shall, under pain and penalty of perjury, be based upon actual knowledge and not merely on information and belief.

Upon receipt of a verified written complaint, or upon receipt of evidence which is deemed sufficient by the board, the board may initiate a preliminary investigation into any alleged violation of §§

17-25-18

—

17-25-27

. All board proceedings and records relating to a preliminary investigation shall be confidential, except that the board may turn over to the attorney general evidence that may be used in a criminal proceeding. The board shall notify any person who is the subject of the preliminary investigation of the existence of the investigation and the general nature of the alleged violation by certified or registered mail, return receipt requested, within seven (7) days of the commencement of the investigation.

If a preliminary investigation fails to indicate reasonable cause for belief that §§ 17-25-18 — 17-25-27 have been violated, the board shall immediately terminate the investigation and notify, in writing, the complainant, if any, and the person who had been the subject of the investigation.

If a preliminary investigation indicates reasonable cause for belief that §§ 17-25-18 — 17-25-27 have been violated, the board may, upon a majority vote, initiate a full investigation and appropriate proceedings to determine whether there has been a violation.

All testimony in board proceedings shall be under oath. All parties shall have the right to call and examine witnesses, to introduce exhibits, to cross-examine witnesses who testify, to submit evidence, and to be represented by counsel. Before testifying, all witnesses shall be given a copy of the regulations governing board proceedings. All witnesses shall be entitled to be represented by counsel.

Any person whose name is mentioned during a proceeding of the board and who may be adversely affected by it may appear personally before the board on his or her own behalf or file a written statement for incorporation into the record of the proceeding.

Within fourteen (14) days after the end of proceedings, the board shall meet in executive session for the purpose of reviewing the evidence before it. Within thirty (30) days after completion of deliberations, the board shall publish a written report of its findings and conclusions.

Upon a finding that there has been a violation of §§ 17-25-18 — 17-25-27 or any other campaign finance law, the board may issue an order requiring the violator to:

Cease and desist from the violation;

File any report, statements or other information as required by this chapter; and/or

Pay a civil fine for each violation of any section of this chapter in an amount authorized by that section or, if no authorization exists, in amount not to exceed the greater of one thousand dollars ($1,000) or three (3) times the amount the violator failed to properly report or unlawfully contributed, expended, gave, or received.

The board may turn over to the attorney general any evidence that may be used in a subsequent criminal proceeding against any violator.

The board may file a civil action in superior court to enforce an order issued by it pursuant to this section.

Any final action by the board made pursuant to this chapter shall be subject to review in superior court upon petition of any interested person filed within thirty (30) days after the action for which review is sought. The court shall enter a judgment enforcing, modifying, or setting aside the order of the board, or it may remand the proceeding to the board for any further action that the court may decide.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 420, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 345, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 21, § 3; P.L. 2001, ch. 176, § 2.

17-25-29.
Appropriations.

In the event the funds generated by the tax credit of §

44-30-2(d)

fail to produce sufficient money to meet the requirements of the public financing of the electoral system as set forth in §§

17-25-19

—

17-25-27

, then funds sufficient to meet the levels of the public financing as set forth in this chapter shall be supplied from the general fund of the state treasury. There is appropriated from the general treasury those sums that may be necessary for carrying out the purposes of the public financing of the electoral system, and an amount equal to the total of all maximum amounts of matching public funds available to all party and independent candidates for general office qualifying and electing to receive public funds in an election shall be transferred to the board of elections no later than September 1 of each election year and deposited in a manner that will secure the highest rate of interest available consistent with the safety of the sums and with the requirement that all sums on deposit be available for immediate payment to eligible candidates at any time after the date of the primary election. The state controller is authorized and directed to draw his or her orders upon the general treasurer for transfer of all sums the board deems necessary to comply with this section. There shall also be transferred to the board any additional sums that may be required until the permitted limits are reached. The board shall account for all funds disbursed pursuant to this chapter and transfer upon the conclusion of any election for general office any and all undisbursed sums to the general treasurer for deposit in the general fund by December 1 in any year in which the election is held.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 420, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 21, § 3.

17-25-30.
Public financing of election campaigns — Compliance benefits.

Any candidate eligible to receive public funds who complies in full with eligibility criteria for receipt of the funds shall be:

Entitled to an additional benefit of free time on community antenna television to be allocated pursuant to rules determined by the administrator for the division of public utilities. During all allocated free time, the candidate shall personally appear and present the message of the advertisement; provided, however, the content of all television time shall include captioning for the deaf and hard of hearing and the content of all radio time must be available in a written or text format at the time of request; and

Entitled to an additional benefit of free time on any public broadcasting station operating under the jurisdiction of the Rhode Island PBS foundation pursuant to rules determined by the Federal Communications Commission (FCC). During all allocated free time, the candidate shall personally appear and personally present the message of the advertisement; provided, however, the content of all television time shall include captioning for the deaf and hard of hearing and the content of all radio time must be available in a written or text format at the time of request.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 21, § 2; P.L. 2007, ch. 223, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 235, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 229, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 230, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 144, art. 7, § 4; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 50.

17-25-30.1.
Community antenna television — Rules and regulations.

The administrator for the division of public utilities for the state of Rhode Island shall formulate rules and regulations concerning the allocation of advertising time to be used by those candidates for public office who are eligible to receive public funds and who comply in full with all eligible criteria for receipt of the funds.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 21, § 2.